Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 15 Public Defender

12-15-1.
Office created.

There is created the office of public defender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-1

.

12-15-2.
Appointment and term of public defender.

The governor with the advice and consent of the senate shall appoint a member of the bar of this state who has been admitted to practice law for at least five (5) years to fill the office of the public defender. The public defender shall serve a term of six (6) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-2

; P.L. 1968, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 36, § 1.

12-15-3.
Duty to represent indigent defendants.

It shall be the duty of the public defender to represent and act as attorney for indigent defendants in those criminal cases referred to him or her by the supreme court, by the superior courts, by the district courts, and as are set forth in §

14-1-31

, and he or she shall be engaged full time in that capacity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-3

; P.L. 1966, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 3, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 49, § 1.

12-15-4.
Office facilities.

The public defender shall have an office in the Providence County Courthouse which shall be assigned to him or her for his or her use by the Providence county courthouse commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-4

.

12-15-5.
Powers to accept grants and bequests.

The public defender shall have the power to apply for and accept grants and bequests of funds from other states, interstate agencies, and independent authorities, and private firms, individuals, and foundations, for the purpose of carrying out his or her lawful responsibilities. The funds shall be deposited with the general treasurer in a restricted receipt account established within the department to permit funds to be expended in accordance with the provisions of the grant or bequest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 461, § 1.

12-15-6.
Assistant defenders.

The public defender may appoint any assistants that may be deemed necessary, whose power and duties shall be similar to those imposed upon the public defender by law and shall be performed under and by the advice and direction of the public defender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-6

; P.L. 1968, ch. 3, § 3.

12-15-7.
Appropriations for expenses.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum or sums that it may deem necessary for the payment of the salaries of any clerical assistance that may be deemed necessary and for the payment of office expenses and other actual expenses incurred by the public defender in the performance of his or her duties; and the controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or sums, or as much of the sum or sums as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the public defender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1007, § 7; P.L. 1942, ch. 1133, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-15-7

.

12-15-8.
“Indigent defendants” defined.

For the purpose of assisting the public defender or his or her assistants to carry out their duties under this chapter, “indigent defendant,” when used in connection with representation and action as attorney by the public defender or one of his or her assistants in cases before the courts under this chapter, includes a person who after payment of necessary expenses for food, shelter and medical care, does not have sufficient income or assets to enable him or her to retain counsel nor is there any one to whom he or she is entitled to look for support who has that income or assets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 3, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 175, § 1.

12-15-9.
Eligibility for assistance.

Every person who seeks the services of the office of the public defender under this chapter must make affidavit under oath that, after payment of necessary expenses for food, shelter and medical care, he or she does not have sufficient income or assets to enable him or her to retain counsel, nor is there any one to whom he or she is entitled to look for support who has that income or assets. The public defender, on his or her own instigation or at the request of a referring court, may require a further financial statement, may require relevant documents, and may conduct any investigation he or she deems appropriate. If the public defender, after examination and investigation of the financial statement, is satisfied that the person submitting it is an indigent defendant, the public defender or one of his or her assistants shall defend the person; provided, that if the public defender is satisfied that the person is not an indigent defendant, he or she shall notify the court which referred the person to the public defender’s office of the determination that the person is not an indigent defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 175, § 1.

12-15-10.
Confidential nature of financial statement.

The public defender, his or her assistants, and every employee of his or her office is expressly prohibited from divulging to any individual not officially connected with his or her office any information obtained by the public defender, his or her assistants, or any employee of that office in the regular course of their duty or from any financial statement submitted under §

12-15-9

or from the records and reports of their investigation, or from the permanent records of that office, which would reveal any of the information relative to the financial status or any person submitting a financial statement. Every request for information directed to the public defender shall be denied if the request would necessitate that individual to divulge any information which is declared in this section to be held confidential by the public defender; provided, the public defender is authorized to divulge the information confidentially held by that office to the court referring a defendant in a criminal case to the public defender’s office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 271, § 2.

12-15-11.
Penalty for false representation.

Whoever knowingly makes a false statement or representation to the public defender, assistants, or any employee of that office to obtain the legal services of the public defender or one of his or her assistants under this chapter, either for himself or herself or for any other person, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), or by imprisonment not longer than thirty (30) days, or both. Each false statement or representation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 196, § 1.